Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.303, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Chairnew text begin and vice-chairnew text end . The chair of the commission alternates between the president of the senate and the speaker of the house deleted text begin of representativesdeleted text end at the start of the regular legislative session in each odd-numbered year.new text begin When not serving as chair, the president of the senate or the speaker of the house serves as vice-chair.new text end